District of Columbia statutes.
34-1126

Schedule of joint rates to be filed.

Where a schedule of joint rates or charges is, or may be, in force between 2 or more public utilities, such schedule shall in like manner be printed and filed with the Commission, and so much thereof as the Commission shall deem necessary for the use of the public shall be filed in every such station or office, as provided in § 34-1125.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 981, ch. 150, § 8, par. 27

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-526.
1973 Ed., § 43-326.